Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-123
Record of credentials issued under act; department; duties; contents.

(1) The department shall establish and maintain a record of all credentials issued pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act. The record shall contain identifying information for each credential holder and the credential issued pursuant to the act.

(2) For individual credential holders engaged in a profession:

(a) The record information shall include:

(i) The name, date and place of birth, and social security number;

(ii) The street, rural route, or post office address;

(iii) The school and date of graduation;

(iv) The name of examination, date of examination, and ratings or grades received, if any;

(v) The type of credential issued, the date the credential was issued, the identifying name and number assigned to the credential, and the basis on which the credential was issued;

(vi) The status of the credential; and

(vii) A description of any disciplinary action against the credential, including, but not limited to, the type of disciplinary action, the effective date of the disciplinary action, and a description of the basis for any such disciplinary action;

(b) The record may contain any additional information the department deems appropriate to advance or support the purpose of the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(c) The record may be maintained in computer files or paper copies and may be stored on microfilm or in similar form; and

(d) The record is a public record, except that social security numbers shall not be public information but may be shared as specified in subsection (5) of section 38-130.

(3) For credential holders engaged in a business:

(a) The record information shall include:

(i) The full name and address of the business;

(ii) The type of credential issued, the date the credential was issued, the identifying name and number assigned to the credential, and the basis on which the credential was issued;

(iii) The status of the credential; and

(iv) A description of any disciplinary action against the credential, including, but not limited to, the type of disciplinary action, the effective date of the disciplinary action, and a description of the basis for any such disciplinary action;

(b) The record may contain any additional information the department deems appropriate to advance or support the purpose of the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(c) The record may be maintained in computer files or paper copies and may be stored on microfilm or in similar form; and

(d) The record is a public record.

(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided, if the department is required to provide notice or notify an applicant or credential holder under the Uniform Credentialing Act, such requirements shall be satisfied by sending a notice to such applicant or credential holder at his or her last address of record.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB417, § 4.